Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
CHAPTER 3 Standards, Labeling, and Adulteration of Drugs and Cosmetics

Cross references.

Permits for persons producing and manufacturing serums and vaccines for use in poultry and animals,
T. 4, C. 9.

Law reviews.

For article, “Liability for Vaccine Injury: The United States, the European Union, and the Developing World,” see 67 Emory L.J. 415 (2018).

For comment, “Process Is Due: The World Health Organization Prequalification of Medicines,” see 68 Emory L.J. 645 (2019).

For article, “Free Speech and Off-Label Rights,” see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 463 (2020).

26-3-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Georgia Drug and Cosmetic Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 1; Code 1933, § 79A-1001, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

26-3-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Advertisement” means all representations disseminated in any manner or by any means other than by labeling for the purpose of inducing or which are likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of drugs, devices, or cosmetics.

“Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.

“Contaminated with filth” applies to any drug, device, or cosmetic not securely protected from dust, dirt, and, as far as may be necessary by all reasonable means, from all foreign or injurious contamination.

“Cosmetic” means:

Articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance; and

Articles intended for use as a component of any such articles, except that such term shall not include soap.

“Device” (except when used in paragraph (10) of Code Section 26-3-3, paragraph (3) of Code Section 26-3-8, paragraph (3) of Code Section 26-3-12, and Code Section 26-3-14) means instruments, apparatus, and contrivances, including their components, parts, and accessories, intended:

For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man; or

To affect the structure or any function of the body of man.

“Drug” means:

Articles recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them;

Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man;

Articles other than food intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man;

Articles intended for use as a component of any article specified in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), but does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

“Federal act” means the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (Title 21 U.S.C. Section 301, et seq.; 52 Stat. 1040, et seq.).

“Immediate container” does not include package liners.

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate container of any article; and a requirement made by or under authority of this chapter that any word, statement, or other information appearing on the label shall not be considered to be complied with unless such word, statement, or other information also appears on or is easily legible through any existing outside container or wrapper.

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matters:

Upon an article or any of its containers or wrappers; or

Accompanying such article.

“New drug” means:

Any drug the composition of which is such that such drug is not generally recognized among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate the safety of drugs as safe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof; or

Any drug the composition of which is such that such drug, as a result of investigations to determine its safety for use under such conditions, has become so recognized, but which has not been used to a material extent or for a material time under such conditions other than in such investigations.

“Official compendium” means the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, company, or association.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 2; Code 1933, § 79A-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 26; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 26.

Cross references.

State Board of Pharmacy generally, §

26-4-20

et seq.

26-3-3.
Prohibited acts.

The following acts and the causing thereof within this state are prohibited:

The manufacture, sale or delivery, or holding or offering for sale of any drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded;

(1.1)

The holding of any drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded;

The adulteration or misbranding of any drug, device, or cosmetic;

The receipt in commerce of any drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded and the delivery or proffered delivery thereof for pay or otherwise;

The sale, delivery for sale, holding for sale, or offering for sale of any article in violation of Code Section 26-3-10;

The dissemination of any false advertisement;

The refusal to permit entry or inspection or to permit the taking of a sample as authorized by Code Section 26-3-17;

The giving of a guarantee or undertaking which is false except by a person who relied on a guarantee or undertaking to the same effect signed by and containing the name and address of the person residing in this state from whom he received the drug, device, or cosmetic in good faith;

The removal or disposal of a detained or embargoed article in violation of Code Section 26-3-4;

The alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, removal of the whole or any part of the labeling of, or the doing of any other act with respect to a drug, device, or cosmetic if such act is done while such article is held for sale and results in such article being misbranded;

Forging, counterfeiting, simulating, falsely representing, or without proper authority using any mark, stamp, tag, label, or other identification device authorized or required by regulations promulgated under this chapter; and

The use on the labeling of any drug or in any advertisement relating to such drug of any representation or suggestion that any application with respect to such drug is effective under or complies with Code Section 26-3-10.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 3; Code 1933, § 79A-1003, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1609, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Products Liability Law in Georgia: Is Change Coming?,” see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 353 (1974).

26-3-4.
Detention of adulterated or misbranded drugs and cosmetics.

Whenever a duly authorized agent of the State Board of Pharmacy finds or has probable cause to believe that any drug or cosmetic is adulterated or so misbranded as to be dangerous or fraudulent within the meaning of this chapter, he shall affix to such article a tag or other appropriate marking giving notice that such article is, or is suspected of being, adulterated or misbranded and has been detained or embargoed and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of such article by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by the agent or the court. It shall be unlawful for any person to remove or dispose of such detained or embargoed article by sale or otherwise without permission.

When an article detained or embargoed under subsection (a) of this Code section has been found by such agent to be adulterated or misbranded, he shall petition the judge of the superior court of the appropriate county for an action for condemnation of such article. When such agent has found that an article so detained or embargoed is not adulterated or misbranded, he shall remove the tags or other markings.

If the court finds that a detained or embargoed article is adulterated or misbranded, such article shall, after entry of the decree, be destroyed at the expense of the claimant thereof under the supervision of the State Board of Pharmacy; and all court costs and fees, storage, and other proper expenses shall be taxed against the claimant of such articles or his agent, provided that when the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the article, the court, after entry of the decree and after such costs, fees, and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond, conditioned that such article shall be so labeled or processed, has been executed, may by proper order direct that such article be delivered to the claimant thereof for such labeling or processing under the supervision of an agent of the State Board of Pharmacy. The expense of such supervision shall be paid by the claimant. Such article shall be returned to the claimant of the article on representation to the court by the State Board of Pharmacy that the article is no longer in violation of this chapter and that the expense of such supervision has been paid.

Whenever the State Board of Pharmacy or any of its authorized agents shall find in any room, building, vehicle for transportation, or other structure any drug, device, or cosmetic which is unsound or contains any filthy, decomposed, or putrid substance or that may be poisonous or deleterious to health or otherwise unsafe, the same being declared to be a nuisance, the State Board of Pharmacy or its authorized agents shall immediately condemn or destroy the same.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 6; Code 1933, § 79A-1005, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 26.

26-3-5.
Duty of prosecuting attorney upon report of violation; notice to possible defendant.

It shall be the duty of each prosecuting attorney to whom the State Board of Pharmacy reports any violation of this chapter to cause appropriate criminal proceedings to be instituted in the appropriate court without delay and to prosecute same in the manner provided by law. Before any violation of this chapter is reported to any prosecuting attorney for the institution of a criminal proceeding, the person against whom such proceeding is contemplated shall be given appropriate notice and an opportunity to present his views before the State Board of Pharmacy or its designated agent, either orally or in writing, in person, or by attorney with regard to such contemplated proceedings.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 7; Code 1933, § 79A-1006, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

26-3-6.
Minor violations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the State Board of Pharmacy to report minor violations of this chapter for the institution of proceedings under this chapter, whenever the State Board of Pharmacy believes that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 8; Code 1933, § 79A-1007, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

26-3-7.
When a drug or device deemed adulterated.

A drug or device shall be deemed to be adulterated:

If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance;

If it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health;

If it is a drug and its container is composed in whole or in part of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health; or

If it is a drug and it bears or contains for purposes of coloring only a coal-tar color other than one from a batch certified under the authority of the federal act;

If it purports to be or is represented as a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium and its strength differs from or its quality or purity falls below the standard set forth in such compendium. Such determination as to strength, quality, or purity shall be made in accordance with the tests or methods of assay set forth in such compendium or, in the absence of or inadequacy of such tests or methods of assay, those prescribed under authority of the federal act. No drug defined in an official compendium shall be deemed to be adulterated under this paragraph because it differs from the standard of strength, quality, or purity therefor set forth in such compendium if its difference in strength, quality, or purity from such standard is plainly stated on its label. Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, it shall be subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it shall be subject to the provisions of the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States and not to those of the United States Pharmacopoeia;

If it is not subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this Code section and its strength differs from or its purity or quality falls below that which it purports or is represented to possess; or

If it is a drug and any substance has been:

Mixed or packed therewith so as to reduce its quality or strength; or

Substituted wholly or in part therefor.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 9; Code 1933, § 79A-1008, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 26.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, a comma was deleted following “differs from” in the first sentence of paragraph (2).

26-3-8.
When a drug or device deemed misbranded.

A drug or device shall be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

If in package form unless it bears a label containing:

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and

An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count, provided that reasonable variations shall be permitted and exemptions as to small packages shall be established by regulations prescribed by the State Board of Pharmacy;

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with conspicuousness as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices in the labeling and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use;

If it is for use by man and contains any quantity of the narcotic or hypnotic substance alphaeucaine, barbituric acid, betaeucaine, bromal, cannabis, carbromal, chloral, coca, cocaine, codeine, heroin, marijuana, morphine, opium, paraldehyde, peyote, sulfonmethane, or any chemical derivative of such substance which has been found after investigation by the State Board of Pharmacy to be and by regulations under this chapter designated as habit forming, or any synthetic narcotic or drug unless its label bears the name and quantity or proportion of such substance or derivative and in juxtaposition therewith the statement “Warning — May be habit forming”;

If it is a drug and is not designated solely by a name recognized in an official compendium unless its label bears:

The common or usual name of the drug if there is such; and

In case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each active ingredient including the kind and quantity or proportion of any alcohol and also including, whether active or not, the name and quantity or proportion of any bromides, ether, chloroform, acetanilid, acetophenetidin, amidopyrine, antipyrine, atropine, hyoscine, hyoscyamine, arsenic, digitalis, glucosides, mercury, ouabain, strophanthin, strychnine, thyroid, or any derivative or preparation of any such substance contained therein, provided that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this subparagraph is impracticable, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by the State Board of Pharmacy;

Unless its labeling bears:

Adequate directions for use; and

Adequate warnings against use by children or in those pathological conditions where its use may be dangerous to health or against unsafe dosage or methods or duration of administration or application in such manner and form as are necessary for the protection of users.

Where any requirement of division (i) of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph as applied to any drug or device is not necessary for the protection of the public health, the State Board of Pharmacy shall promulgate regulations exempting such drug or device from such requirements;

If it is purported to be a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium unless it is packaged and labeled as prescribed therein, provided that the method of packing may be modified with consent of the State Board of Pharmacy. Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, it shall be subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia with respect to packaging and labeling unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it shall be subject to the provisions of the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States and not to those of the United States Pharmacopoeia;

If it has been found by the State Board of Pharmacy to be a drug liable to deterioration unless it is packaged in such form and manner and its label bears a statement or such precautions as the State Board of Pharmacy shall by regulations require as necessary for the protection of public health. No such regulation shall be established for any drug recognized in an official compendium until the State Board of Pharmacy shall have informed the appropriate body charged with the revision of such compendium of the need for such packaging or labeling requirements and such body shall have failed within a reasonable time to prescribe such requirements;

If it is a drug and its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading;

If it is an imitation of another drug; or

If it is offered for sale under the name of another drug;

If it is dangerous to health when used in the dosage or with the frequency or duration prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof; or

If it is a drug intended for use by man which:

Is a habit-forming drug to which paragraph (4) of this subsection applies;

Because of its toxicity or other potentiality for harmful effect, the method of use, or the collateral measures necessary to its use is not safe for use except under the supervision of a practitioner licensed by law to administer such drug; or

Is limited by an effective application under Section 505 of the federal act to use under the professional supervision of a practitioner licensed by law to administer such drug unless it is dispensed only:

Upon a written prescription of a practitioner licensed by law to administer such drug;

Upon an oral prescription of such practitioner which is reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacist; or

By refilling any such written or oral prescription if such refilling is authorized by the prescriber either in the original prescription or by oral order which is reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacist.

Any drug dispensed by filling or refilling a written or oral prescription of a practitioner licensed by law to administer such drug shall be exempt from the requirements of this Code section except paragraphs (1) and (9) of subsection (a) of this Code section if the drug bears a label containing the name and address of the dispenser, the serial number and date of the prescription or of its filling, the name of the prescriber, and, if stated in the prescription, the name of the patient and the directions for use and cautionary statements, if any, contained in such prescription. This exemption shall not apply to any drug dispensed in the course of the conduct of a business of dispensing drugs pursuant to diagnosis by mail or to a drug dispensed in violation of paragraph (11) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1906, p. 83, § 5; Civil Code 1910, § 2104; Ga. L. 1913, p. 44, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 42-110; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1463, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 10; Code 1933, § 79A-1009, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 26; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 26; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 26/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, inserted “or” at the end of paragraph (a)(10).

Cross references.

Deceptive trade practices generally, §

10-1-370

et seq.

Controlled substances and dangerous drugs,
T. 16, C. 13.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, in subparagraph (a)(2)(B), “, provided that” was substituted for “; provided, that” and a semicolon was substituted for a period following “Pharmacy”; in paragraph (a)(4), a comma was deleted following “Pharmacy”; and, in subparagraph (a)(5)(B), a comma was deleted following “such substance”.

U.S. Code.

Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, referred to in subparagraph (a)(11)(C) of this Code section, is codified at

21 U.S.C. § 355

.

Law reviews.

For comment on Givens v. Lederle, 556 F.2d 1341 (5th Cir. 1977) which extends a manufacturer’s duty to warn physicians about affects the drugs may have on third person bystanders, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 643 (1978).

For note, “Does the National Childhood Vaccine Injury Compensation Act Really Prohibit Design Defect Claims?: Examining Federal Preemption in Light of American Home Products Corp. v. Ferrari,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 617 (2010).

26-3-9.
Name and address of manufacturer on label of drugs requiring prescription.

Any drug product designed for human usage which is branded as follows:

“Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription”

shall bear on the label the name and address of the manufacturer.

For the purposes of this Code section, the term “manufacturer” includes any of the following parties:

The person who is responsible for the production of the drug and maintains control over the processing of same;

The person to whose specifications the drug is manufactured and who reviews adherence to such specifications through a drug testing program;

The person who manufactures the drug product and then packs and ships the said drug products on behalf of the person designated on the label as being responsible for the drug product; or

The person who manufactures the drug product and which product is distributed by the person designated on the label as being responsible for the drug without testing to determine adherence to specifications for manufacture.

Where the drug product is manufactured by an affiliated or subsidiary company of the distributor, the name and address of the distributor only need appear.

History.

Code 1933, § 79A-1009.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 691, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 26.

26-3-10.
Selling, delivering, or giving away of new drugs; exemptions.

No person shall sell, deliver, offer for sale, hold for sale, or give away any new drug unless:

An application with respect thereto has become effective under Section 505 of the federal act; or

When not subject to the federal act unless such drug has been tested and has not been found to be unsafe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof and prior to selling or offering such drug for sale, there has been filed with the State Board of Pharmacy an application setting forth:

Full reports of investigations which have been made to show whether or not such drug is safe for use;

A full list of the articles used as components of such drug;

A full statement of the composition of such drug;

A full description of the methods used in and the facilities and controls used for the manufacture, processing, and packing of such drug;

Such samples of such drug and of the articles used as components thereof as the State Board of Pharmacy may require; and

Specimens of the labeling proposed to be used for such drug.

An application provided for in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall become effective 60 days after the filing thereof, except that if the State Board of Pharmacy finds after due notice to the applicant and after giving him an opportunity for a hearing that the drug is not safe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the proposed labeling thereof, he shall prior to the effective date of the application issue an order refusing to permit the application to become effective.

This Code section shall not apply:

To a drug intended solely for investigational use by experts qualified by scientific training and experience to investigate the safety in drugs, provided the drug is plainly labeled “For investigational use only”; or

To a drug sold in the state at any time prior to the enactment of this chapter or introduced into interstate commerce at any time prior to the enactment of the federal act; or

To any drug manufactured, labeled, and sold for veterinary purposes.

An order refusing to permit an application under this Code section to become effective may be revoked by the State Board of Pharmacy.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 11; Code 1933, § 79A-1010, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

U.S. Code.

Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, referred to in paragraph (a)(1) of this Code section, is codified at

21 U.S.C. § 355

.

26-3-11.
When a cosmetic deemed adulterated.

A cosmetic shall be deemed to be adulterated:

If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to users under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof or under such conditions of use as are customary or usual, provided that this paragraph shall not apply to coal-tar hair dye, the label of which bears the following legend conspicuously displayed thereon: “Caution — This product contains ingredients which may cause skin irritation on certain individuals and a preliminary test according to accompanying directions should first be made. This product must not be used for dyeing the eyelashes or eyebrows; to do so may cause blindness,” and the labeling of which bears adequate directions for such preliminary testing;

If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance;

If it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health;

If its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health; or

If it is not a hair dye and it bears or contains a coal-tar color other than one from a batch which has been certified under authority of the federal act.

For the purpose of paragraphs (1) and (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the term “hair dye” shall not include eyelash dyes or eyebrow dyes.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 12; Code 1933, § 79A-1011, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

26-3-12.
When a cosmetic deemed misbranded.

A cosmetic shall be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

If in package form unless it bears a label containing:

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and

An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count, provided that reasonable variations shall be permitted and exemptions as to small packages shall be established by regulations prescribed by the State Board of Pharmacy;

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices in the labeling and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use; or

If its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 13; Code 1933, § 79A-1012, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 26.

Cross references.

Deceptive trade practices generally, §

10-1-370

et seq.

26-3-13.
When a drug, device, or cosmetic advertisement deemed false.

An advertisement of a drug, device, or cosmetic shall be deemed to be completely false if it is false or misleading in any particular.

For the purpose of this chapter the advertisement of a drug or device representing it to have any effect in albuminuria, appendicitis, arteriosclerosis, blood poisoning, bone disease, Bright’s disease, cancer, carbuncles, cholecystitis, diabetes, diphtheria, dropsy, erysipelas, gallstones, heart and vascular diseases, high blood pressure, mastoiditis, measles, meningitis, mumps, nephritis, otitis media, paralysis, pneumonia, poliomyelitis or infantile paralysis, prostate gland disorders, pylelitis, scarlet fever, sexual impotence, sinus infection, smallpox, tuberculosis, tumors, typhoid, uremia, or sexually transmitted disease shall also be deemed to be false, except that no advertisement not in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be deemed to be false under this subsection if it is disseminated only to members of the medical, dental, or veterinary professions, appears only in the scientific periodicals of these professions, or is disseminated only for the purpose of public health education by persons not commercially interested directly or indirectly in the sale of such drugs or devices, provided that whenever the State Board of Pharmacy determines that an advance in medical science has made any type of self-medication safe as to any of the diseases named in this subsection, the board shall by regulation authorize the advertisement of drugs having curative or therapeutic effect for such disease subject to such conditions and restrictions as the board may deem necessary in the interest of public health, provided that this subsection shall not be construed as indicating that self-medication for diseases other than those named herein is safe or efficacious.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 14; Code 1933, § 79A-1013, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 26; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 8/SB 372.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “sexually transmitted” for “venereal” in the middle of subsection (b).

Cross references.

False advertising generally, §

10-1-420

et seq.

26-3-14.
Factors taken into account in determining whether label or advertisement is misleading.

If an article is alleged to be misbranded because the labeling is misleading or if an advertisement is alleged to be false because it is misleading, then in determining whether the labeling or advertisement is misleading there shall be taken into account, among other things not only representations made or suggested by statement, word, design, device, sound, or any combination thereof, but also the extent to which the labeling or advertisement fails to reveal facts material in the light of such representations or material with respect to consequences which may result from the use of the article to which the labeling or advertisement relates under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof or under such conditions of use as are customary or usual.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 2; Code 1933, § 79A-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

26-3-15.
Labeling or advertisement of a drug as an antiseptic.

The representation of a drug in its labeling or advertisement as an antiseptic shall be considered to be a representation that it is a germicide, except in the case of a drug purporting to be or represented as an antiseptic for inhibitory use as a wet dressing, ointment, dusting powder, or such other use as involves prolonged contact with the body.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 2; Code 1933, § 79A-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

26-3-16.
Promulgation of regulations; conformity with federal act.

The authority to promulgate regulations for the efficient enforcement of this chapter is vested in the State Board of Pharmacy. The board is authorized to make the regulations promulgated under this chapter conform insofar as practicable with those promulgated under the federal act.

No drug, device, or cosmetic which is subject to and complies with regulations promulgated under the provisions of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act relating to adulteration and misbranding shall be deemed to be adulterated or misbranded in violation of this chapter because of its failure to comply with regulations promulgated under this chapter insofar as the regulations are in conflict with regulations relating to adulteration and misbranding under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 15; Code 1933, § 79A-1014, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

26-3-17.
Inspection of factories, warehouses, establishments, or vehicles; samples and specimens.

The State Board of Pharmacy or its duly authorized agent shall have free access at all reasonable times to any factory, warehouse, or establishment in which drugs, devices, or cosmetics are manufactured, processed, packed, or held for introduction into commerce or to enter any vehicle being used to transport or hold such drugs, devices, or cosmetics in commerce for the purpose:

Of inspecting such factory, warehouse, establishment, or vehicle to determine if any of the provisions of this chapter are being violated; or

To secure samples or specimens of any drug, device, or cosmetic after paying or offering to pay for such sample. It shall be the duty of the State Board of Pharmacy to make or cause to be made examinations of samples secured under this Code section to determine whether or not this chapter is being violated.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 16; Code 1933, § 79A-1015, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

26-3-18.
Assistance in enforcement from Department of Agriculture or Department of Public Health.

In addition to the remedies provided in this chapter and to provide for more efficient enforcement of this chapter, the State Board of Pharmacy or the director of the Georgia Drugs and Narcotics Agency may ask the Department of Agriculture and the Department of Public Health for assistance; and, in such event, either or both such departments may render such assistance. Any employee or agent of either such department engaged in the rendering of such assistance shall be an authorized agent of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 16A; Code 1933, § 79A-1016, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 625, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

26-3-19.
Reports and publications by State Board of Pharmacy.

The State Board of Pharmacy may cause to be published from time to time reports summarizing all judgments, decrees, and court orders which have been rendered under this chapter, including the nature of the charge and the disposition thereof.

The board may also cause to be disseminated such information regarding drugs, devices, and cosmetics as the board deems necessary in the interest of public health and the protection of the consumer against fraud.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit the board from collecting, reporting, and illustrating the results of the investigations of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 17; Code 1933, § 79A-1017, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

26-3-20.
Injunctions for violations of Code Section 26-3-3.

In addition to the remedies provided for in this chapter, the State Board of Pharmacy is authorized to bring an action in the appropriate court of the county for an injunction. Such court shall have jurisdiction, upon hearing and for cause shown to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating Code Section 26-3-3, notwithstanding whether or not there exists an adequate remedy at law.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 4; Code 1933, § 79A-1004, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

26-3-21.
Construction of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter regarding the selling of drugs, devices, or cosmetics shall be considered to include the manufacture, production, processing, packing, exposure, offering, possession, and holding of any such article for sale, the sale, dispensing, and giving of any such article, and the supplying or applying of any such articles in the conduct of any drug or cosmetic establishment.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, § 2; Code 1933, § 79A-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.

Cross references.

Insurance coverage for prescription drugs used in manner different than use authorized by FDA, §

33-24-59.11

.

26-3-22.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Other laws unaffected by chapter.

This chapter shall be cumulative and supplemental to any and all existing laws relating to the subject matter of drugs. Specifically, nothing contained in this chapter shall be so construed as to relieve any person, firm, or corporation from complying with any requirements as prescribed by Chapter 4 of this title, Article 3 of Chapter 13 of Title 16, the “Dangerous Drug Act,” Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 16, the “Georgia Controlled Substances Act,” or Title 21 C.F.R. 210, the federal “current good manufacturing practices in manufacturing, processing, packing, or holding of drugs: general.”

Nothing contained in this chapter shall amend, alter, supersede, or replace the laws of this state relative to feed, food, animal remedies, hog cholera serum or virus, drugs permitted to be added to feeds, bottling supplies, nor the duty and authority of the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

Code 1933, § 79A-1018, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1555, § 8; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 26.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-3-22 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.